ope/plugins/com.oxygenxml.pdf.css/lib/oxygen-pdf-chemistry/config/hyph/de_1901.xml
uri2c
u2r1im
ur1ini
ur3ins
ur1int
urk3se
ur4matt
4u1ro
u3rol
u1rö
ur3p
2urr
ur3re
ur2san
ur2sau
ur2ser
urst4r
ur4sw
urs2ze
urt2
u3ru
ury5
ur2z1a
ur2zä
ur2zec
ur2zi
ur2z1o
ur2z1w
2us
u2s1af
us4ann
us5art
u1sä
u6schent
u5schmu
usch5wer
u2s1ec
u2s1ei
u3seid
u3sep
use1ra
u2serp
u2s1ese
usi3er.
usi5ers.
u3sig
us5is.
us3kl
usmas2
usma5sse
u1so
us3oc
u3soh
u3sol
u2s1op
us1ou
u1sö
u1sp
u2spac
us3part
u2s1pas
u2spat
u3spek
us1pic
u2spo
us2por
u2spu
usse4g
u4s3sel
us2sen
us5sende
us6seni
ussenma7s
us2ser
us3ser.
uss5erfa
usser6kl
uss5er6su
u4sset
us2sez
u3ssig
us2sof
u2stab
ust3abe
u3stal
us2tat
us2ten
us2ter
us2th
ust2in
u3stis
u2s1tor
u2strä
u4strit
u3s4trop
u2s1tur
u2sty
u1su
us2ur
2uß
u2ß1u
2u1t
u3ta.
ut1alt
ut3a2m
u2t1ap
u2t1ar
u2t1är
u3te
u4t1ed
ut1e4ge
ut1ei.
ut1eie
ute2n1
u2tent
uter4er
u4t3er4sa
ut2es
ut2et
u4tev
u4t1ex
utfi4
ut2he
u2thi
u2t3ho
u2thu
utli4n
utmas2
utma5sse
u3to.
uto4ber
uto3c
u3tom
ut1opf
u2tops
ut4or
ut3rea
ut3rü
ut3s2a
ut2s1ä
ut4schl
ut4schm
ut4schö
ut3si
ut1s2p
ut2s3pa
utt4an
ut3te
ut3t4l
utt1s2
utu4re
utu5ru
utz3eng
ut2z1in
ut2zo
ut2z1w
2u1u2
u1ü2
u1v4
u2ve.
uve3rä
u1w
2u1x
ux2e
ux2o
ux3t
u1ya
2u1z
uz3ot
uz1we
uz3z4
1üb
üb1ä
2übc
2übd
übe2
übe4n3
über3
ü4bet
üb3l
üb3r
2üc
ü1che
üch3l
üch4s1c
üch5t4e
ück1er
ück3eri
ück4spe
ü4d3a4
üden2g
ü3d2ens
üd1o4
üdö4
üd3r
üd3s2
üdsa1
üd3t4
üdwe2
ü4f1a
ü2f1ei
üfer2
ü2f1erg
üf2fl
ü2f1i
üf3l
üf2to
ü1g
üge6lei6s
ü2g3l
ü2gn
üg3s
üh1a
ü1he
ü2h1ei
ü2h1eng
üh1erf
ü2h1er2k
ü2h1er2z
üh1i
ühl1ac
üh1lam
üh3l2e
üh3mo
üh3ne
üh1o
üh3r2e
ühr3ei.
üh1ro
ühr3ta
ühs2
üh3stu
üh3t
üh4th
üht4r
ü1hu
üh1w
ü1k2
2ül
ül1a
ül2c
ü3l4e
ülla4
üll1au
ül2lei
ül3ler
ül4leu
ül2lo
ü1lu
ü2ment
4ün
ü2n1a
ün2da
ün2dr
ünen3
ün2f1a
ün2f1ei
ün2fli
ün2fr
ün2g3l
ünt2
ü1nu
ün2za
ün2zw
ü1pe
üpf3l
ü1pi
üp2pl
ür1a
ü2r1ei
ür2fl
ür2fr
ür4g3en4g
ü1r2o3
ür4ster
ürt2h
ür2zö
ür2zw
üs2a
ü2schl
ü5se
üse3h
üse3l
ü1sp
üs2s1c
üss2e
ü4s3sel
üs3si
üs4st
üs2su
ü2sta
ü2str
ü1su
ü1ß
2üt
ü1ta
ü2t1al
ü1te
ü1ti
üt3r
üt4s1
üt2tr
ü1tu
ü1v
ü1z
2v1ab
va1c
val2s
2vang
2varb
vas2
v4at
va2t3a4
va2tei
va2t3h
vatik2
va4t1in
vati8ons.
va2t3r
vat3s4
va2t1u
vat3z
2v1au
vä1
2v1b
2v1d
1ve2
ve3ar
ve3b
ve3c
ve3d
ve3g
ve3h
ve4i
2v1ein
veit4
veits1
ve3la
ve4l1au
ve3le
ve3li
vel3l
ve3lo
ve3ma
2ve3mu
ve3nal
ven2c
ve3ne
venen4d
ve3ni
ve3nö
ve3nü
ve3o
ver1
ver3a
ve3rad
ve3rand
ve3ras
ver3b2
ver5d2
vere2
verf4
verg4
vergas6
ve3ri
ve4rin
ver3k
vermas8sen
ver3sta
vert2
ver5te
ver3u
ve3s
2vesc
2vese
ve4sh
ve4s1p
ves4t
ve3ta
vete1
ve3to
ve3tr
2veü
ve3v
ve3x2
2v1f4
2v1g
2v1h
vi3ar
vi4a3t
vi2c
vi3de
vie2h3a
vi2el
vi3en
vie4rec
vie2w1
vig2
2vii
vi2l1a
vi4l1e2h
vi2l1in
vil3l
2v1i2m
vima2
vi4na
vin2s
2v1int
vi3sa
vise4
vi3s2o
vi2sp
vis2u
2v1k
2v1l2
2v1m
2v1n
2v1ob
vo3ga
vo2gu
3vol
vol2la
voll7auf.
vollen4
vol6l5end
voller4
vol6lerw
vol2li
2v1op
vo2r1
vor3a
vor3e
vor3g
vo3ri
vo5rig
vormen4
vorö4
3voy
2v1p
v2r
2v3ra
v3re
v4ree
2v3ro
2v1s
vs2e
v3s2z
2v1t
vu2et
2vumf
2v1v
2v1w
2v1z
w2a
1waa
wab2bl
wa3che
wach6stu
wach4t4r
waffe2
waffel3
1wag
wa5ge
wa2g3n
wa3go
1wah
wahl5ent
wah4ler
wah2li
wai2b
1wal
2walb
wal4da
wa2les
wal4li4n
2walm
wal2ta
wal2to
walt4st
wa3na
w3anf
wang4s
1wann
wan6z5en6d
wa2p
1war2e
ware1i
wart4e
1was
wa3sa
wa4scha
wa3sche
wa3schi
wa3sh
wass4e
1wäh
1wäl
wäm3
2wäng
1wäs3
wä5sc
wä4ss
2w1b2
wbu2
2w1c
2w1d
we2a
we2ba
4webeb
we2bl
web3s
we2e4
weed3
we2fl
1weg
we2g1a
we2g3l
we4gn
we2g3r
weg1s
weg3sa
1weh
we4i
wei4bl
2weie
weifel6d
weik4
1weil
wei3sc
weiss3p
wei4tr
weit1s
wel6schl
wel6schr
wel2t1
welt3a4
wel6t5en6d
wem2ma2
wen3a4
wen2gl
we3ni
wen4k3ri
we2r3a
wer2bl
1werbu
werd2
5werdens
1werdu
werer2
wer2fl
wer4gel
we4r3io
1werk.
wer2ka
1werke
wer2kl
wer2ku
we2rö
wer4sta
wer2t1a
wer4t3ei
wer6t5erm
wer2to
1wese
wesen4s3
we2sp
wes2t
we2st1a
we4st3ei
we4steu
we4sti
we2st1o2
we2stö
we2st3r
we4stu
1wet
wet2s
wett3s
2w1ey
2w1g
2w3h
1wid
wi2e
wie3l2
wien2e
wie4st
wik2
1wil
wim2ma
wim4mu
win4d3ec
win2dr
win2e
2wing
win8n7er8sc
win4num
1wi4r
wi3s2e
wi2sp
1wiss
wi3st
wi3th
1witzl
2w1k
2w1l
2w1m
2wn
wn3s
1wo1c
wo2cha
woche4
1woh
woh4lei
1wolf
wolf4s1
wol4la
wol2lä
wol4ler
wor3a
wo2r3i
wor2t3r
wo4r3u
wot2
1wöc
wört2h
2w1p
w2r
w3ro
2w1s
w3s2k
2w1t
wti2
w2u
1wuc
wuch4sc
wuls2
wun2da
wun4g3r
wun2s
4wur.
wur2fa
1wurst
wus4
1wu4t1
1wüh
wüs4
2w1w
2w1z
x1a
1xa.
2xa2b
1x2ad
1xae
xa1fl
1x2ag
xa2m
xand4
x2anz
1x2as
xau3
xaus2
2x1b
2xc
x1ce
x1ch
x1cl
4x1d
1xe
x1e4g
2xek
xe2l
x1em
3x2em.
xemp4
x2en
xen3s2
x2er.
x2ere
xers2
3xes
2x3eu
2x1f
2x1g
2x1h
xib4
xi1c
xich2
2xid
xide2
xi2d1em
x1i2do
xie3l
xi3g
xil1
xil2a
xi2lo
xi2lu
xin3s2
x2is
xi2s1e
xi2s1o2
xis5s
xi2su
x1i2tu
x1j
2x1k2
4x2l2
x3lä
x3le
2x1m
2x1n
x1or
4x1p
xpor6ter
x1q
2x1r
2x3s2
4x1t
x2t1a
x3ta.
x3t2as
xt1ä
x2tän
x2t1e2d
x2t1ei
x2tent
x2t1er2f
x2t3ev
xtfi4
x2t1il2l
xtra3b4
x2t3ran
xt1s2
xt1u
x3t2ur
1xu
xu1a
x1u2n
xu2s
2xv
2x1w
2xy
3xy.
3xys
x1z
2y1ab
1yac
y1al.
y1a2m
yan2g
y1ank
y1ät
y1b
y1c2
y2chi
y3chis
ych3n
y1d4
y1e
y2ef
yen4n
y2ere
yes2
y2es.
ye4st
ye2th
y1f2
y1g
ygi2
ygie5
yg2l
y1h
yhr2
y1i4
y1j
y1k2
yke3n
yk3s2
y1l
y2l3a2m
yl4ante
yl5b
yl3c
y4le.
yli4n
yllo2
yllö2
yloni1
y2l1u
yma2t
ymp2
ym2pha
ympi1
y2n1o
yno4d
ynt2
y1of
yom2
yon4i
y1ont
y1os
y1ou
y1p
ypa2
yp3an
ype2
y2pf
y3ph
y2p1in
ypo3
y4p3s
y1r
y3r2e
y3ri
yri2a
yri1e
y3r4o
yrr2
y1s
ys2an
ys2c
yse1
y3s2h
y4s3l
ysme3
ys2pa
yst2
y2s1u2
y3s2z
y1t2
y2te.
y2tes
y3to
yu2r
yure3
y1v
y1w
y1y
y1z2
za2
2z3ab
zab3l
za3cha
za3chä
2z1ad
2z1af
za3ge
za3gr
3z2ah
zah4ner
2z3ak
za3li
2z1all
2z1am
z1an
za3ne
2z3anf
3zani
3z2ank
zan4kl
2z3anl
za3no
zanti1
za3ra
2zarb
2zarc
za3re
2z1arm
za3ro
z1arti
zar2tr
2z1arz
z1as
zast4
2z3at3
3zaub
z1au2f
z3aug
3zaun
2z1äc
3z2äh
2z1äm
2zängs
2z1äp
z1ärg
z1ärm
4z1b4
zbü1b
zbübe3
2z3c
2z3d2
zdan2
zdä1
zeau3
zeaus4
2z1e2ben
2zecho
ze1e
2z1eff
zehe4
zehen1
zeh2l
zeik4
zei3la
zeile4
2z1ein
zei3s2
zeist4
zei2t1a
zeit5end
zei4t3er
zei2tr
zeit3ri
ze2l1a2
zelau2
ze2len
ze2l1er
ze2l1in
zel3l2a
zel4leh
zel4li4n
zels2
zel3sz
zel3t2h
zel3tr
zelu2
2z1emp
5zen.
ze4n3ac
ze2nä
zen3n
ze2no
zens2e
zen4sem
zent3s
zen4z3er
z2er.
ze2r3a
ze2re2b
2z1ergä
4z3ergeb
z3erhal
2zerhö
zerin4t
zerk2
z2erl.
2zerlö
z2ern
zer4neb
zer4n3ei
2z1erq
zers2
2z1ersa
4z3erste
4z3erstr
3zert
zert1a4
zer4t3ag
zert4an
zer6tere
zer6terl
zer4tin
zer6trau
4zerwei
2z1erz
3z2erza
ze2s
zes2c
ze3sku
zessen4
zes6s5end
zes2sp
ze3stau
ze2ß1
ze2tr
2zetts
2z1ex
2z1f4
zfäs3
2z1g2
zger2a
2z1h
z2hen
zhir3
3zi.
zi3alo
zi3ar
zi2dei
zid3r
zie4lei
zi1erh
zi1es.
3zig
zil2e
zil3l
2z1imp
zim2t3
zin2e
zin3ei
zin4er
2z1inf
z1inh
zin1it
zin2sa
zin4ser
4zinsuf
z1int
z1inv
zi2o3
zi3op
zirk2
zirk6s1
zis4t
zistras6
zi3s2z
zit2h
zi2t1o2
ziv2
2z1j
2z1k4
2z1l2
2z1m2
2z3n2
2z1ob
2z1of
zo2gl
2z1oh
3zol
zolla2
zol3le
zol2li2
zol3lu
zon4ter
zo2o
2z1ope
z1or
zo2ri
zor4ne
zo3se
2z1osz
2zö2f
2z1ök
z1öl
2zön
2z3p4
2z1q
2z3r2
4z1s2
z3sa
z3sh
z3sk
z3str
z3sz
2z1t
z2t1au
z4tehe
zte3str
z3t2her
zt3ho
zt1ins
zt3rec
zt3s2
zu3a
zu3b4
3zu4c
zud4
zudi4
zu2el
zu3f4
zu2g1ar
zu4gent
zu3gl
zug4ste
zug1un
2z1uhr
zuh2u
zu1i
zu3k
2z1um.
zumen2
2zumf
2zumg
2zuml
2zumr
2z1ums
zun2e
2zunt
zup2fi
zu3r2a
z1urk
2z1url
2z1urs
2z1urt
zu3s2
zu3t2a
zuz2
2züb
zür1c
2z1v
zw2
z1wac
2zwag
2zwah
zwan2d1
z2wang
z1war
2zwas
4zwäl
2zweg
2zweh
z2weig
zwei3s
2z1wel
2z1wen
2z1wer
z2werg
2z1wes
2zwet
2zwir
z2wit
2z1wo
z1wör
z1wur
2z1wü
2z1z
z3z4a
zze3s
z3z2o
zz2ö
</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
